Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5575.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 409d. As used in section 409c: (a) "Corrections officer" means any of the following: (i) A prison or jail guard or other prison or jail personnel. (ii) Any of the personnel of a boot camp, special alternative incarceration unit, or other minimum security correctional facility. (iii) A parole or probation officer. (b) "Firefighter" means that term as defined in section 1 of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.1. (c) "First responder" includes a law enforcement officer, a corrections officer, a firefighter, and any emergency medical service personnel described in section 20950 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20950. (d) "Harass" means to willfully engage in a course of conduct directed at a first responder that intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in the first responder and serves no legitimate purpose. (e) "Law enforcement officer" means that term as defined in section 2 of the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.602. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5574 (request no. H05806'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.